ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 주방/식탁 > 바 용품: 압생트 용기; 바 매트; 맥주 디스펜서/탭; 음료 냉각 큐브/스틱; 음료 얼음통 및 냉각기; 병마개; 스토퍼/병마개; 컵받침 꽂이; 컵받침; 칵테일/바 도구 세트; 칵테일 셰이커/도구; 코르크스크루; 디캔터; 칵테일용 장식물; 호일 커터; 얼음통; 와인 에어레이터; 와인 병 홀더
vi: Nhà và vườn > Phòng bếp và phòng ăn > Đồ uống rượu: Tháp rượu absinthe; Thảm lót quầy bar; Tháp & vòi rót bia; Viên và que làm lạnh đồ uống; Xô đựng đá và thiết bị làm mát; Nắp chai; Nút chai và nắp chai; Hộp cất đế lót ly; Tấm lót cốc; Bộ đồ dùng quầy bar và pha chế cocktail; Dụng cụ lắc cocktail; Đồ khui; Bình lắng rượu; Đồ cài trang trí ly; Dụng cụ cắt vỏ nút chai rượu; Xô đá; Thiết bị rót rượu; Giá đế rượu vang
nl: Huis en tuin > Keuken en eetkamer > Baraccessoires: Absintfonteinen; Barmatten; Bierdispensers en -tappen; Whiskystenen; Drankenkoelers; Flessendoppen; Kurken; Houders voor onderzetters; Onderzetters; Barsetjes; Cocktailshakers en -benodigdheden; Kurkentrekkers; Karaffen; Drankbedels; Foliesnijders; IJsemmers; Decanteerders; Wijnfleshouders
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Produtos de cozinha e aparelhos de jantar > Utensílios para bares: Fontes de absinto; Tapetes de bar; Torneiras de chope; Pedras para gelar uísque; Tubos e resfriadores de bebidas; Tampas; Rolhas e protetores de garrafas; Aparadores de porta-copo; Porta-copos; Conjuntos de utensílios para drinques; Misturadores e utensílios para drinques; Saca-rolhas; Decantadores; Enfeites para bebidas; Cortadores de alumínio; Baldes de gelo; Aeradores de vinho; Suportes para garrafas de vinho
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Κουζίνα & τραπεζαρία > Είδη μπαρ: Συντριβάνια αψεντιού; Πατάκια μπαρ; Διανεμητές & βρύσες μπύρας; Κύβοι & μπαστούνια ψύξης ποτών; Δοχεία & ψύκτες ποτών; Καπάκια μπουκαλιών; Πώματα σφράγισης & προστατευτικά μπουκαλιών; Βάσεις σουβέρ; Σουβέρ; Σετ εργαλείων για κοκτέιλ και μπάρ; Σέικερ &εργαλεία για κοκτέιλ; Τιρμπουσόν; Καράφες; Διακοσμητικά ποτών; Κόφτες αλουμινόχαρτου; Κουβάδες πάγου; Αεριστήρες κρασιού; Θήκες μπουκαλιών κρασιού
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Kuhinja i blagovaonica > Oprema za bar: Fontane za apsint; Podloge za šank; Točionici i slavine za pivo; Kockice i štapići za hlađenje pića; Posude s ledom i rashladni uređaji za pića; Čepovi za boce; Pluteni čepovi i zatvarači za boce; Držači za podmetače; Podmetači; Setovi alata za koktele i bar; Shaker i alati za pripremu koktela; Vadičepi; Dekanteri; Ukrasi za čaše; Rezači za foliju; Kante za led; Aeratori za vino; Držači za vinsku bocu
en: Home & Garden > Kitchen & Dining > Barware: Absinthe Fountains; Bar Mats; Beer Dispensers & Taps; Beverage Chilling Cubes & Sticks; Beverage Tubs & Chillers; Bottle Caps; Bottle Stoppers & Savers; Coaster Holders; Coasters; Cocktail & Barware Tool Sets; Cocktail Shakers & Tools; Corkscrews; Decanters; Drink Charms; Foil Cutters; Ice Buckets; Wine Aerators; Wine Bottle Holders
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Keittiö ja ruokailu > Baaritarvikkeet: Absinttilähteet; Baaritiskimatot; Olutautomaatit ja -hanat; Juomien viilennyspalat ja -tikut; Juomaviilentimet ja coolerit; Pullonkorkit; Pullonsulkijat; Lasinalustelineet; Lasinaluset; Cocktail- ja baarivälinesetit; Cocktail-shakerit ja -välineet; Korkkiruuvit; Dekanterit; Juomalasiamuletit; Kapselileikkurit; Viinicoolerit; Viini-ilmaajat; Viinipullotelineet
es: Casa y jardín > Cocina y comedor > Utensilios para bares: Fuentes de absenta; Tapetes para barra; Grifos y dispensadores de cerveza; Cubos de piedra para whisky y palos enfriadores de vino; Recipientes y refrigeradores de bebidas; Tapones; Tapones para botellas; Soportes para posavasos; Posavasos; Juegos de utensilios para bebidas; Cocteleras y accesorios; Sacacorchos; Decantadores; Dijes para bebidas; Cortacápsulas; Cubos de hielo; Oxigenadores de vino; Soportes para botellas de vino
sv: Hem och trädgård > Kök och matsal > Bartillbehör: Absintfontäner; Barmattor; Ölkranar; Whiskystenar; Ishink och kylare; Flaskkapsyler; Flaskstopp och flaskförslutare; Underläggshållare; Glasunderlägg; Verktygsset för drinkar; Drinkshakers och drinkverktyg; Korkskruvar; Karaffer; Drink charms; Folieskärare; Ishinkar; Vinluftare; Vinflaskhållare
cs: Dům a zahrada > Kuchyně a jídelny > Barové nádobí: Fontánky na absint; Barové rohože; Výčepní zařízení; Chladicí kostky a tyče do nápojů; Chladicí nádoby na nápoje; Víčka na láhve; Zátky a uzávěry lahví; Stojánky na podložky pod hrnky; Pivní tácky; Sady vybavení na přípravu nápojů; Šejkry a krustovače; Vývrtky; Karafy; Přívěsky na nápoje; Řezáky na fólie; Chladicí nádoby a kyblíky na led; Provzdušňovače na víno; Stojany na láhev
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Mutfak ve Yemek > İçki Takımları: Absent Semaverleri; Bar Matları; Bira Sebilleri ve Muslukları; İçecek Soğutma Küpleri ve Çubukları; İçecek Kovaları ve Soğutucuları; Şişe Kapakları; Şişe Mantar ve Kapakları; Altlıklar; Bardak Altlıkları; İçki Alet Setleri; Kokteyl Çalkalayıcıları ve Aletleri; Tirbuşonlar; Şarap Sürahileri; İçecek Takıları; Folyo Kesiciler; Buz Kovaları; Şarap Havalandırıcılar; Şarap Şişesi Tutucular
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Кухня и трапезария > Оборудване за барове: Фонтани за абсент; Бар матове; Диспенсъри и кранове за бира; Кубчета за охлаждане на напитки и клечки; Кофи и охладители за напитки; Капачки за бутилки; Запушалки и тапи за бутилки; Поставки за подложки за чаши; Подложки за чаши; Комплекти инструменти за коктейли и барове; Шейкъри за коктейли и инструменти; Тирбушони; Гарафи; Декорации за чаши; Резачки за фолио; Кофи за лед; Аератори за вино; Поставки за бутилки за вино
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 廚房與餐廳 > 吧檯用具: 苦艾酒泉; 吧台墊; 啤酒裝填器和分接頭; 保冷冰石/條; 飲料冰桶; 瓶蓋; 瓶塞; 杯墊架; 杯墊; 雞尾酒/吧檯用具組; 雞尾酒調酒器和其他工具; 軟木塞開瓶器; 醒酒瓶; 酒杯標識物; 錫箔紙切割器; 冰塊桶; 醒酒器; 酒瓶架
it: Casa e giardino > Cucina e pranzo > Materiale da bar: Fontane per assenzio; Tappetini da bar; Spine e dispenser per birra; Cubetti di ghiaccio per whisky; Portabottiglie e secchielli per il ghiaccio; Cappucci per bottiglie; Tappi per bottiglie; Contenitori per sottobicchieri; Sottobicchieri; Set di strumenti per cocktail e bevande; Shaker e strumenti da cocktail; Cavatappi; Caraffe; Charm per drink; Taglia pellicola alluminio; Secchielli per il ghiaccio; Aeratori per vino; Portabottiglie
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Kuhinja in jedilnica > Barska oprema: Fontane za absint; Barske podloge; Aparati za točenje piva in pipe za pivo; Kocke in palčke za hlajenje pijač; Hladilne kadi in posode za pijačo; Zamaški za steklenice; Zapiralci in zamaški za steklenice; Stojala za podstavke; Podstavki; Kompleti orodja za koktajle in barsko posodo; Mešalniki in orodja za koktajle; Odpirači za steklenice; Dekanterji; Okraski za pijače; Rezalniki folije; Vedra za led; Prezračevalniki vina; Stojala za vinske steklenice
da: Hjem og have > Køkken og spisestue > Barudstyr: Absintfontæner; Barmåtter; Ølhaner; Whiskey-sten; Spande og køleskabe til afkøling af drikkevarer; Flaskekapsler; Flaskepropper; Holdere til bordskånere; Glasbrikker; Drinkredskaber – sæt; Cocktailshakere og -redskaber; Proptrækkere; Dekantering; Drinkcharms; Foliskærere; Isspande; Vinluftere; Vinflaskeholdere
th: บ้านและสวน > ห้องครัวและการรับประทานอาหาร > อุปกรณ์ที่ใช้กับบาร์: น้ำพุแอบซิน; แผ่นรองแก้วบาร์; หัวจ่ายเบียร์สด; คิวบ์และแท่งทำความเย็นของเครื่องดื่ม; ถังและเครื่องทำความเย็นสำหรับเครื่องดื่ม; ฝาขวด; จุกและฝาปิดขวด; ที่ใส่ที่รองแก้ว; ที่รองแก้ว; ชุดบาร์และอุปกรณ์ผสมเครื่องดื่ม; กระบอกเชคและเครื่องมือทำค็อกเทล; ที่เปิดขวดไวน์; ขวดเหล้า; ของประดับกุ๊กกิ๊ก; ที่ตัดกระดาษฟอยล์; ถังน้ำแข็ง; ไวน์แอเรเตอร์; ที่ใส่ขวดไวน์
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > キッチン・ダイニング > バー用品: アブサンファウンテン; バーマット; ビアサーバー; ウィスキーストーン; 飲料水用クーラーボックス・冷蔵庫; ボトル キャップ; ワインキャップ・ワインセーバー; コースターホルダー; コースター; バーツールセット; カクテル用品; コルク抜き; デカンタ; ドリンクチャーム; ホイルカッター; アイスバケツ; ワインエアレーター; ワインボトルホルダー
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Cozinha e refeições > Artigos para bar: Fontes de absinto; Tapetes para bar; Dispensadores e torneiras de cerveja; Cubos e varas para refrigerar bebidas; Cubas e recipientes para refrigeração de bebidas; Tampas para garrafas; Rolhas para garrafas; Suportes para bases de copos; Bases de copos; Conjuntos de ferramentas de artigos para bar e cocktail; Shakers e ferramentas para cocktail; Saca-rolhas; Decantadores; Adornos para bebidas; Cortadores de película; Baldes de gelo; Arejadores de vinho; Suportes de garrafa de vinho
hu: Otthon és kert > Konyha és étkező > Bárfelszerelés: Abszintszökőkutak; Bárszőnyegek; Söradagolók és -csapok; Italhűtő kockák és rudak; Italtartók és -hűtők; Üvegkupakok; Üvegdugók és -tartók; Poháralátét-tartók; Poháralátétek; Koktél- és bárfelszerelés-eszközkészletek; Koktélrázók és -eszközök; Dugóhúzók; Dekanterek; Italdíszek; Fóliavágók; Jégvödrök; Borlevegőztetők; Borosüveg-tartó
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Kuchyňa a jedáleň > Pomôcky na prípravu miešaných nápojov: Sklenené karafy; Barmanské podložky; Výčapné stojany na pivo; Ľadové kamene a slamky do nápojov; Nádoby na chladenie nápojov a chladničky na nápoje; Uzávery fliaš; Zátky a viečka na fľaše; Držiaky na podložky pod poháre; Podložky pod poháre; Súpravy pomôcok na prípravu miešaných nápojov; Šejkery a pomôcky na prípravu koktailov; Vývrtky; Dekantéry; Značky na poháre; Orezávače fólií; Nádoby na ľad; Prevzdušňovače vína; Držiaky na vínové fľaše
pl: Dom i ogród > Kuchnia i jadalnia > Naczynia barowe: Fontanny do absyntu; Maty barowe; Nalewaki do piwa; Kamienie do whisky; Pojemniki do schładzania napojów; Nakrętki i kapsle na butelki; Zatyczki do butelek; Stojaki na podkładki; Podstawki; Zestawy przyborów do drinków; Shakery i przybory do drinków; Korkociągi; Karafki; Akcesoria do drinków; Noże do folii; Wiaderka do lodu; Aeratory do wina; Stojaki na wino
de: Heim & Garten > Küche & Esszimmer > Bar-Utensilien: Absinth-Fontänen; Barmatten; Bierzapfhähne; Kühlsteine & -Sticks für Getränke; Getränkewannen & -kühler; Flaschenverschlüsse; Flaschenstöpsel & -verschlüsse; Untersetzerhalter; Untersetzer; Cocktail- & Barzubehörsets; Cocktailshaker & Zubehör; Korkenzieher; Dekanter; Getränkverzierungen; Folienschneider; Eiseimer; Weindekantierer; Weinflaschenhalter
ru: Дом и сад > Кухня и сервировка стола > Барная посуда: Фонтаны для абсента; Барные коврики; Пивные башни и краны; Кубики и палочки для охлаждения напитков; Устройства и емкости для охлаждения напитков; Крышки для бутылок; Пробки и затычки для бутылок; Держатели для костеров; Костеры; Наборы барной посуды и инструментов для приготовления коктейлей; Шейкеры и инструменты для приготовления коктейлей; Штопоры; Графины и декантеры; Украшения для бокалов; Резаки для фольги; Ведерки для льда; Аэраторы для вина; Держатели для бутылок с вином
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Virtuvė ir valgomasis > Baro reikmenys: Absento fontanėliai; Baro kilimėliai; Alaus dozatoriai ir čiaupai; Gėrimų šaldymo kubeliai ir lazdelės; Gėrimų kibirėliai ir aušintuvai; Butelių kamščiai; Įkišami butelių kamščiai; Padėkliukų laikikliai; Padėkliukai; Kokteilių ir baro reikmenų rinkiniai; Kokteilių plaktuvai ir įrankiai; Kamščiatraukiai; Grafinai; Gėrimų pakabukai; Folijos pjovikliai; Ledo kibirėliai; Vyno aeratoriai; Vyno butelių laikikliai
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 厨房/餐厅 > 酒吧酒具: 苦艾酒喷泉式滴水器; 吧台垫; 啤酒桶龙头; 饮料制冷/制冰块和制冷棒; 冰酒盆; 瓶盖; 瓶塞; 杯垫架; 杯垫; 鸡尾酒/酒吧工具套装; 鸡尾酒调酒器/工具; 红酒开瓶器; 醒酒器/醒酒瓶; 饮料饰物; 锡箔切割器; 冰桶; 醒酒器; 酒瓶架
fr: Maison et jardin > Arts de la table et arts culinaires > Accessoires de bar: Fontaines à absinthe; Tapis de bar; Tireuses à bière; Glaçons réutilisables et bâtons réfrigérants pour boissons; Seaux et rafraîchisseurs pour boissons; Capsules; Bouchons stoppeurs et bouchons à vin; Supports pour dessous de verres; Dessous de verres; Kits d’accessoires pour boissons et cocktails; Shakers et accessoires; Tire-bouchons; Carafes; Breloques de boisson; Coupe-papier aluminium; Seaux à glace; Aérateurs de vin; Porte-bouteilles de vin
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Bucătărie și sufragerie > Articole de bar: Fântâni pentru absint; Covorașe de bar; Dozatoare și robinete pentru bere; Cuburi pentru răcirea băuturilor și bețișoare; Recipiente și răcitoare pentru băuturi; Capace pentru sticle; Dopuri pentru sticle; Organizatoare pentru suporturi pentru pahare; Suporturi pentru pahare; Seturi de instrumente pentru cocteil și bar; Shakere și instrumente pentru cocteiluri; Tirbușoane; Decantoare; Talismane identificare pahare; Aparate de tăiat folie; Frapiere; Aeratoare pentru vinuri; Suporturi pentru sticle de vin
nb: Hjem og hage > Kjøkken og spiserom > Barutstyr: Absintfontener; Barmatter; Øldispensere og tappekraner; Kjølebiter og pinner for drikkevarer; Drikkerør og -kjølere; Flaskekorker; Flaskestoppere; Drikkebrikkeholdere; Drikkebrikker; Verktøysett for cocktails og barutstyr; Cocktailshakere og verktøy; Korketrekkere; Karafler; Drikkeanheng; Foliekuttere; Isbøtter; Vinareatorer; Vinflaskeholdere